Tennessee, session 114, SB0085.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-246(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (39).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-248(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Tennessee board of court reporting, created by § 20-9-604;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0085
000344
- 1 -